src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kol_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - кол: # Noun 'mother'
     кол+N+Sg+Nom: кол
     кол+N+Sg+Gen: колын
     кол+N+Sg+Acc: колым
     кол+N+Sg+Com: колге
     кол+N+Sg+Dat: коллан
     кол+N+Sg+Ine: колышты
     кол+N+Sg+Ill: колышкы
     кол+N+Sg+Lat: колеш
     кол+N+Sg+Cmpr: колла
     кол+N+Sg+Abe: колде
     кол+N+Pl+Nom: колвлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Gen: колвлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Acc: колвлӓм
     кол+N+Pl+Com: колвлӓге
     кол+N+Pl+Dat: колвлӓлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Ine: колвлӓштӹ
     кол+N+Pl+Ill: [колвлӓшкӹ, колвлӓш]
     кол+N+Pl+Lat: колвлӓэш
     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr: колвлӓлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Abe: колвлӓде

#     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/CP: [колем, колэм] # х2 колэмжӹ
     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/CP: колем
     кол+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC: колемӹн
     кол+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC: колемӹм
     кол+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC: колемге
     кол+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC: колемлӓн
     кол+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/CP: колыштем
     кол+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/CP: колышкем
     кол+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/CP: колешем
#     кол+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: [коллаэм, колемлӓ] 
     кол+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/CP: коллаэм 
     кол+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: колемлӓ 
#     кол+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: [колдеэм, колемде] 
     кол+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/CP: колдеэм
     кол+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: колемде 
#     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓэм, колемвлӓ] # х3
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP: колвлӓэм
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓм
#     кол+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓэмге]
     кол+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/NPC: колвлӓэмге
#     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓэмлӓн, колвлӓлӓнем, колемвлӓлӓ]
     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NPC: колвлӓэмлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/NCP: колвлӓлӓнем
     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓлӓн
# Is this usage or morphology?
#     кол+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓштем, колемвлӓштӹ] 
#     кол+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓшкем, колемвлӓшкӹ]
     кол+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/NCP: колвлӓштем
     кол+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/NCP: колвлӓшкем
#     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓэшем, колемвлӓэш]
     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/NCP: колвлӓэшем
     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓэш
#     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓэмлӓ, колвлӓлӓэм, колемвлӓлӓ]
     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NPC: колвлӓэмлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/NCP: колвлӓлӓэм
     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓлӓ
#     кол+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: [колвлӓэмде, колемвлӓде]
     кол+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/NPC: колвлӓэмде
     кол+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: колемвлӓде

     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/CP: колет
     кол+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+So/PC: колетӹн
     кол+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+So/PC: колетӹм
     кол+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+So/PC: колетге
     кол+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2+So/PC: колетлӓн
     кол+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+So/CP: колыштет #??
     кол+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+So/CP: колышкет
     кол+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2+So/PC: колетӹш
     кол+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PC: колетлӓ #
     кол+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2+So/PC: колетде
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/NCP: колвлӓэт
     кол+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓн #
     кол+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓм
     кол+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓге
     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓлӓн #пӧрт:пӧртвлӓлӓнет
     кол+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓштӹ
     кол+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2+So/PNC: [колетвлӓшкӹ, колетвлӓш]
     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓэш
     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2+So/PNC: колетвлӓде

     кол+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/CP: колжы
     кол+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC: колжын
     кол+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC: колжым
     кол+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3+So/PC: колжыге 
     кол+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC: колжылан 
     кол+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/CP: колыштыжы #??
     кол+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/CP: колышкыжы #??
     кол+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP: колешӹжӹ #
     кол+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PC: колжыла
     кол+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/PC: колжыде
     кол+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+So/NCP: колвлӓжӹ
     кол+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹн
     кол+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹм
     кол+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹге
     кол+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹлӓн
     кол+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹштӹ #??
     кол+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹшкӹ #??
     кол+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3+So/NCP: колвлӓэшӹжӹ #??
     кол+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹлӓ
     кол+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3+So/NPC: колвлӓжӹде


#колт, колэт, колэтшӹ, 
#колжы, 
